Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,100
Landlord; removal or exclusion of tenant; failure to supply services; tenant; remedies.

If a landlord unlawfully removes or excludes a tenant from a mobile home park or willfully diminishes services to a tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of electric, gas, water, or other essential service to the tenant, the tenant may recover possession, require the restoration of essential services, or terminate the rental agreement and, in any case, recover an amount not to exceed one and one-half months' periodic rent as liquidated damages and reasonable attorney's fees. If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord shall return any prepaid rent and any rental deposit recoverable by the tenant under section 76-1485.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 51.